North Dakota, session 69, HB1263.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 12-60.1-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
12-60.1-04. Hearing on petition.
1. The court may grant a petition to seal a criminal record if the court determines by clear and
convincing evidence:
a. The petitioner has shown good cause for granting the petition;
b. The benefit to the petitioner outweighs the presumption of openness of the criminal
record;
c. The petitioner has completed all terms of imprisonment and probation for the offense;
d. The petitioner has paid all restitution ordered by the court for commission of the offense;
e. The petitioner has demonstrated reformation warranting relief; and
f. The petition complies with the requirements of this chapter.
2. In determining whether to grant a petition, the court shall consider:
a. The nature and severity of the underlying crime that would be sealed;
b. The risk the petitioner poses to society;
c. The length of time since the petitioner committed the offense;
d. The petitioner's rehabilitation since the offense;
e. Aggravating or mitigating factors relating to the underlying crime, including factors
outlined in section 12.1-32-04;
f. The petitioner's criminal record, employment history, and community involvement;
g. The recommendations of law enforcement, prosecutors, corrections officials, and those
familiar with the petitioner and the offense; and
h. The recommendations of victims of the offense.
3. A hearing on the petition may not be held earlier than forty-five days following the filing of the
petition.
4. To the extent practicable, upon receipt of a petition to seal a criminal record, the prosecutor
shall notify and seek input from law enforcement, witnesses, victims, and correctional
authorities familiar with the petitioner and the offense.

H. B. NO. 1263 - PAGE 2
5. This section does not prohibit a prosecutor from stipulating to seal a criminal record without a
hearing or more expeditiously than provided in this section.
6. An individual may not appeal a denial of a petition from a district judge or magistrate.
7. An individual aggrieved by denial of a petition in a municipal court may appeal the denial to
the district court for de novo review without payment of a filing fee. A petition denied by the
district court may not be appealed.
8.7. Except as provided in this section and if good cause is shown, a district court denying a
petition may prohibit a petitioner from filing a subsequent petition to seal a criminal record for
up to three yearsone year following the denial. The order denying the petition must provide the
reasons establishing good cause for prohibiting the petition.
9.8. If a court grants a petition to seal a criminal record, the court shall state in the court order that
the petitioner is sufficiently rehabilitated but is subject to the provisions of section
12.1-33-02.1, and shall release the information when an entity has a statutory obligation to
conduct a criminal history background check.

H. B. NO. 1263 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1263.
House Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 0 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 1 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State